Utah statutes.
76-8-501.   Definitions.

For the purposes of this part:

(1)  "Official proceeding" means any proceeding before a legislative, judicial, administrative, or other governmental body or official authorized by law to take evidence under oath or affirmation, including a notary or other person taking evidence in connection with any of these proceedings.

(2)  "Material" means capable of affecting the course or outcome of the proceeding.  A statement is not material if it is retracted in the course of the official proceeding in which it was made before it became manifest that the falsification was or would be exposed and before it substantially affected the proceeding.

